Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF296.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. Section 147A.8, Code 2025, is amended by adding the following new subsection: NEW SUBSECTION . 3. Provide veterinary medical services by diagnosing or treating a severely injured police service dog as provided in section 169.4. Sec. 2. Section 169.4, Code 2025, is amended by adding the following new subsection: NEW SUBSECTION . 17. a. An emergency medical care provider certified pursuant to chapter 147A who elects to provide veterinary medical services by diagnosing or treating a police service dog, if all of the following apply: Senate File 296, p. 2 (1) The police service dog was on duty under the supervision of a peace officer as defined in section 801.4. (2) The police service dog suffered a severe injury. (3) The veterinary medical services are necessary to immediately stabilize the police service dogâs condition for later diagnosis or treatment by a licensed veterinarian or the holder of a valid temporary permit. b. An emergency medical care provider certified pursuant to chapter 147A may elect not to provide veterinary medical services under paragraph âaâ . c. If an emergency medical care provider certified pursuant to chapter 147A elects to provide veterinary medical services under paragraph âaâ , the emergency medical care provider shall not be civilly liable for diagnosing or treating the police service dog if the emergency medical care provider acted reasonably and in good faith. d. An emergency medical care provider certified pursuant to chapter 147A electing to provide veterinary medical services under paragraph âaâ shall comply with all of the following: (1) The emergency medical care provider may diagnose or treat a severely injured police service dog only after the emergency medical care provider furnishes all diagnoses or treatment needed by the last human at the scene of the emergency. (2) The emergency medical care provider shall not use equipment, or shall discontinue the use of equipment, to diagnose or treat a severely injured police service dog at the scene of an emergency, if any of the following apply: (a) The equipment is needed to diagnose or treat a human at the scene of the emergency. (b) The equipment is dispatched to another location. (3) The emergency medical care provider shall not diagnose or treat a severely injured police service dog, or shall discontinue diagnosing or treating a severely injured police service dog, at the scene of an emergency, if any of the following apply: (a) The emergency medical care provider is dispatched to another location. Senate File 296, p. 3 (b) A vehicle used to transport the emergency medical care provider is dispatched to another location. e. A severely injured police service dog shall not be transported in a vehicle that provides emergency medical or ambulance services. ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House I hereby certify that this bill originated in the Senate and is known as Senate File 296, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ W. CHARLES SMITHSON Secretary of the Senate Approved _______________, 2025 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor